Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 107. Fuel and Ice Plants

§ 3701.
Fuel and ice.

A municipality may establish and maintain a wood, coal, and fuel yard for the purpose of selling fuel at cost to its inhabitants.
It may establish and maintain an ice plant for the purpose of manufacturing, cutting, and storing ice to sell to its inhabitants at cost.

§ 3702.
Ownership of property.

A municipality may acquire and hold for the purposes of section 3701 of this title, real and personal estate to the extent reasonably necessary to operate, equip, and maintain the business covered by said section.